Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Formation

§ 22-4-201.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to form and validity of petition, see §

22-4-402

.

§§ 22-4-202 through 22-4-204.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to circulation, signing and verification of petition, see §§

22-4-403

through

22-4-405

.

§§ 22-4-205 through 22-4-208.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 40, § 1, related to the effect of a valid petition, the application for nomination or election, vacancies in nomination and filing a vacancy in office.